Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INQUILINXS UNIDXS POR JUSTICIA (UNITED RENTERS FOR JUSTICE).new text end new text begin $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Inquilinxs Unidxs por Justicia (United Renters for Justice), a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire, design, and renovate Sky Without Limits, a development providing democratically run, highly affordable housing for 69 families in the city of Minneapolis. This appropriation includes money for site improvements, infrastructure, and landscaping. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end